Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 4 Nomination of Candidates of Political
Bodies for State-Wide Public
Office by Convention

21-2-180.
Manner of qualification.

Any political body which is duly registered as provided for in Code Section 21-2-110 is qualified to nominate candidates for state-wide public office by convention if:

The political body files with the Secretary of State a petition signed by voters equal in number to 1 percent of the registered voters who were registered and eligible to vote in the preceding general election; or

At the preceding general election, the political body nominated a candidate for state-wide office and such candidate received a number of votes equal to 1 percent of the total number of registered voters who were registered and eligible to vote in such general election.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-180

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 890, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-181.
Filing of petitions generally.

Petitions to qualify political bodies to nominate candidates for state-wide public office by convention shall be filed with the Secretary of State and shall be signed by voters in the manner provided in this part. Such petitions shall provide sufficient space for the printing of the voter’s name and for the voter’s signature. No forms other than those prescribed in this part shall be used for qualifying a political body to nominate candidates for public office.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-181

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 890, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-182.
Contents of petitions; signatures.

Each person signing a political body qualifying petition shall declare therein that such person is a duly qualified and registered voter of the state, entitled to vote in the next election for members of the General Assembly, and shall provide with such person’s signature such person’s residence address and county and the date of such person’s signature. No person shall sign the same petition more than once. Each petition shall support the qualification of only one political body. No signature shall be valid if made more than 15 months prior to the submission of the petitions to the Secretary of State. A signature shall be stricken from the petition when the signer so requests prior to the presentation of the petitions to the Secretary of State for filing, but such request shall be disregarded if made after such presentation.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-182

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 890, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-183.
Form of petitions; affidavits of circulators.

A petition to qualify a political body to nominate candidates for public office by convention shall be on one or more sheets of uniform size, and different sheets must be used by signers residing in different counties. The upper portion of each sheet, prior to being signed by any petitioner, shall bear the name and title of the Secretary of State and the political body to be formed by the petition. If more than one sheet is used, they shall be bound together when offered for filing and each sheet shall be numbered consecutively, beginning with number one, at the foot of each page.

Each sheet shall bear on the bottom or back thereof the affidavit of the circulator of such sheet setting forth:

The residence address of the circulator;

That each signer manually signed such signer’s own name with full knowledge of the contents of the political body qualifying petitions;

That, to the best of the affiant’s knowledge and belief, the signers are registered voters of the State of Georgia, qualified to sign the petition;

That their respective residences are correctly stated in the petition; and

That they all reside in the county named in the affidavit.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-183

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 890, § 5; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 15; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-184.
Restriction on amendment or supplementation.

A petition to qualify a political body to nominate candidates for state-wide public office by convention shall not be amended or supplemented after its presentation to the Secretary of State for filing.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-184

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 890, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-185.
Filing deadline.

No petition to qualify a political body shall be submitted to the Secretary of State for verification after 12:00 Noon on the second Tuesday in July.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-185

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 890, § 5; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 16; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-186.
Examination of petitions; judicial review.

Petitions to qualify a political body to nominate candidates for state-wide public office by convention shall be examined and shall be subject to judicial review in the same manner as provided for candidates nominated by petition pursuant to Code Section 21-2-171.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-186

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 890, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-187.
Holding of conventions; filing notice of candidacy.

Political bodies shall hold their conventions in accordance with Code Section 21-2-172, and candidates nominated for state-wide public office in convention shall file a notice of candidacy no earlier than 9:00 A.M. on the fourth Monday in June immediately prior to the election and no later than 12:00 Noon on the Friday following the fourth Monday in June as prescribed in Code Section 21-2-132; provided, however, that the political body must file its qualifying petition no later than 12:00 Noon on the second Tuesday in July following the convention as prescribed in Code Section 21-2-172 in order to qualify its candidates to be listed on the general election ballot.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-187

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 890, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 9; Ga. L. 1989, p. 643, § 8; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 17; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 325, § 9; Ga. L. 2014, p. 1, § 5/HB 310.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 93 (2014).